Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.215

Ignition interlock device.

"Ignition interlock device" means breath alcohol analyzing ignition equipment or other biological or technical device certified in conformance with RCW 43.43.395 and rules adopted by the state patrol and designed to prevent a motor vehicle from being operated by a person who has consumed an alcoholic beverage.

[ 2010 c 268 s 1; 2005 c 200 s 1; 1997 c 229 s 9; 1994 c 275 s 23; 1987 c 247 s 3. Formerly RCW 46.20.730.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1997 c 229: See note following RCW 10.05.090.

Short title—Effective date—1994 c 275: See notes following RCW 46.04.015.